Tennessee statutes. Title 61 Partnerships
Part 1

General Provisions

61-1-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Business” means every trade, occupation, and profession and any other activity, including the holding or ownership of property, entered into for profit;

“Confirmation of good standing” means confirmation by the commissioner of revenue issued through electronic communication to the secretary of state or a certificate of tax clearance that at the time such confirmation is issued a limited liability partnership or a foreign limited liability partnership is current on all taxes and penalties to the satisfaction of the commissioner;

“Debtor in bankruptcy” means a person who is the subject of:

An order for relief under title 11 of the United States Code or a comparable order under a successor statute of general application; or

A comparable order under federal, state, or foreign law governing insolvency;

“Distribution” means a transfer of money or other property from a partnership to a partner in the partner's capacity as a partner or to the partner's transferee;

“Foreign limited liability partnership,” “foreign registered limited liability partnership” or a limited liability partnership or registered limited liability partnership that is designated as “foreign” means a partnership that:

Is formed under the laws of any jurisdiction other than the state of Tennessee; and

Has the status of a limited liability partnership under those laws;

“Limited liability partnership,” “registered limited liability partnership” or a limited liability partnership or registered limited liability partnership that is designated as “domestic” means a partnership that has filed an application for registration as a registered limited liability partnership under § 61-1-1001 and does not have a similar statement in effect in any other jurisdiction;

“Partnership” means an association of two (2) or more persons to carry on as co-owners of a business or other undertaking for profit formed under § 61-1-202, predecessor law, or comparable law of another jurisdiction;

“Partnership agreement” means the agreement, whether written, oral, or implied, among the partners concerning the partnership, including amendments to the partnership agreement;

“Partnership at will” means a partnership in which the partners have not agreed to remain partners until the expiration of a definite term or the completion of a particular undertaking;

“Partnership interest” or “partner's interest in the partnership” means all of a partner's interests in the partnership, including the partner's transferable interest and all management and other rights;

“Person” means an individual, corporation, limited liability company, business trust, estate, trust, partnership (whether general or limited), association, joint venture, government, governmental subdivision, agency, or instrumentality, custodian, nominee or any other individual or entity in its own or any representative capacity, or any other legal or commercial entity;

“Property” means all property, real, personal, or mixed, tangible or intangible, or any interest therein;

“Secretary of state” means the secretary of state of Tennessee;

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States;

“Statement” means a statement of partnership authority under § 61-1-303, a statement of denial under § 61-1-304, a statement of dissociation under § 61-1-704, a statement of dissolution under § 61-1-805, a statement of merger under § 61-1-907, or an amendment or cancellation of any of the foregoing;

“Tax clearance for termination or withdrawal” means confirmation by the commissioner of revenue issued through electronic communication to the secretary of state or a certificate of tax clearance that a limited liability partnership or a foreign limited liability partnership has filed all applicable reports, including, but not limited to, a final report, and has paid all fees, penalties and taxes as required by the revenue laws of this state; and

“Transfer” means an assignment, conveyance, lease, mortgage, deed, and encumbrance.

Acts 2001, ch. 353; 2010, ch. 741, § 48; 2010, ch. 742, §§ 8, 9.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 61-1-101 — 61-1-148, (Acts 1917, ch. 140, §§ 2-43; Shan., §§ 3141b2-3141b42 (p. 6585-6595) Shan. Supp., §§ 3118a53-3118a93; Acts 1927, ch. 34, §§ 1-3; Code 1932, §§ 7841-7882; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7854; Acts 1961, ch. 181, § 1; 1963, ch. 136, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-101 — 61-142; Acts 1982, ch. 773, § 1; Acts 1995 ch. 400, §§ 1-10; 1998, ch. 890, §§ 5, 6; 2000, ch. 568, § 4) was deleted and replaced by Acts 2001, ch. 353 effective January 1, 2002.

The federal bankruptcy act is compiled in 11 U.S.C.

Cross-References. Test for insolvency of partnership, § 66-3-303.

Textbooks. Gibson's Suits in Chancery (7th ed., Inman), § 412.

Tennessee Forms (Robinson, Ramsey and Harwell), Nos. 6-101 — 6-104.

Tennessee Jurisprudence, 20 Tenn. Juris., Partnership, §§ 1-3.

Law Reviews.

An Exegesis of the Ejectment Statutes of Tennessee (R.D. Cox), 18 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 581 (1988).

Comments, Partnership — Bass v. Bass: Implied Partnership Between Nonmarried Cohabitants, 22 Mem. St. U.L. Rev. 391 (1992).

Removal of General Partners: A Method of Intrapartnership Dispute Resolution for Limited Partnerships (Janet L. Eifert), 39 Vand. L. Rev. 1407 (1986).

Shareholder Oppression in Close Corporations: The Unanswered Question on Perspective, 53 Vand. L. Rev. 749 (2000).

The Revised Uniform Partnership Act in Tennessee (Richard Spore), 37 No. 8 Tenn. B.J. 30 (2001).

61-1-102. Knowledge and notice.

A person knows a fact if the person has actual knowledge of it.

A person has notice of a fact if the person:

Knows of it;

Has received a notification of it; or

Has reason to know it exists from all of the facts known to the person at the time in question.

A person notifies or gives a notification to another by taking steps reasonably calculated to inform the other person in ordinary course of business, whether or not the other person learns of it.

A person receives a notification when the notification:

Comes to the person's attention; or

Is duly delivered at the person's place of business or at any other place held out by the person as a place for receiving communications.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (f), a person other than an individual knows, has notice, or receives a notification of a fact for purposes of a particular transaction when the individual conducting the transaction knows, has notice, or receives a notification of the fact, or in any event when the fact would have been brought to the individual's attention if the person had exercised reasonable diligence. The person exercises reasonable diligence if such person maintains reasonable routines for communicating significant information to the individual conducting the transaction and there is reasonable compliance with the routines. Reasonable diligence does not require an individual acting for the person to communicate information unless the communication is part of the individual's regular duties or the individual has reason to know of the transaction and that the transaction would be materially affected by the information.

A partner's knowledge, notice, or receipt of a notification of a fact relating to the partnership is effective immediately as knowledge by, notice to, or receipt of a notification by the partnership, but is not effective as such if the partner committed or consented to a fraud on the partnership.

Acts 2001, ch. 353.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 61-1-101 — 61-1-148, (Acts 1917, ch. 140, §§ 2-43; Shan., §§ 3141b2-3141b42 (p. 6585-6595) Shan. Supp., §§ 3118a53-3118a93; Acts 1927, ch. 34, §§ 1-3; Code 1932, §§ 7841-7882; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7854; Acts 1961, ch. 181, § 1; 1963, ch. 136, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-101—61-142; Acts 1982, ch. 773, § 1; Acts 1995 ch. 400, §§ 1-10; 1998, ch. 890, §§ 5, 6; 2000, ch. 568, § 4) was deleted and replaced by Acts 2001, ch. 353 effective January 1, 2002.

61-1-103. Effect of partnership agreement — Nonwaivable provisions.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b), relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership are governed by the partnership agreement. To the extent the partnership agreement does not otherwise provide, this chapter governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership.

The partnership agreement may not:

Vary the rights and duties under § 61-1-105 except to eliminate the duty to provide copies of statements to all of the partners;

Unreasonably restrict the right of access to books and records under § 61-1-403(b);

Eliminate the duty of loyalty under § 61-1-404(b)(1) and (2) or § 61-1-603(b)(3), but:

The partnership agreement may identify specific types or categories of activities that do not violate the duty of loyalty, if not manifestly unreasonable; or

All of the partners or a number or percentage specified in the partnership agreement may authorize or ratify, after full disclosure of all material facts, a specific act or transaction that otherwise would violate the duty of loyalty;

Unreasonably reduce the duty of care under § 61-1-404(c) or § 61-1-603(b)(3);

Eliminate the obligation of good faith and fair dealing under § 61-1-404(d), but the partnership agreement may prescribe the standards by which the performance of the obligation is to be measured, if the standards are not manifestly unreasonable;

Vary the power to dissociate as a partner under § 61-1-602(a), except to require the notice under § 61-1-601(1) to be in writing;

Vary the right of a court to expel a partner in the events specified in § 61-1-601(5);

Vary the requirement to wind up the partnership business in cases specified in § 61-1-801(4), (5), or (6); or

Vary the law applicable to a limited liability partnership under § 61-1-106(c).

Acts 2001, ch. 353; 2002, ch. 563, § 2.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 61-1-101 — 61-1-148, (Acts 1917, ch. 140, §§ 2-43; Shan., §§ 3141b2-3141b42 (p. 6585-6595) Shan. Supp., §§ 3118a53-3118a93; Acts 1927, ch. 34, §§ 1-3; Code 1932, §§ 7841-7882; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7854; Acts 1961, ch. 181, § 1; 1963, ch. 136, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-101—61-142; Acts 1982, ch. 773, § 1; Acts 1995 ch. 400, §§ 1-10; 1998, ch. 890, §§ 5, 6; 2000, ch. 568, § 4) was deleted and replaced by Acts 2001, ch. 353 effective January 1, 2002.

61-1-104. Supplemental principles of law.

Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

If an obligation to pay interest arises under this chapter and the rate is not specified, the rate is the applicable federal rate as determined from time to time by the United States treasury pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 1274(d) or any successor law.

The rule that statutes in derogation of the common law are to be strictly construed shall have no application to this chapter.

Acts 2001, ch. 353.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 61-1-101 — 61-1-148, (Acts 1917, ch. 140, §§ 2-43; Shan., §§ 3141b2-3141b42 (p. 6585-6595) Shan. Supp., §§ 3118a53-3118a93; Acts 1927, ch. 34, §§ 1-3; Code 1932, §§ 7841-7882; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7854; Acts 1961, ch. 181, § 1; 1963, ch. 136, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-101—61-142; Acts 1982, ch. 773, § 1; Acts 1995 ch. 400, §§ 1-10; 1998, ch. 890, §§ 5, 6; 2000, ch. 568, § 4) was deleted and replaced by Acts 2001, ch. 353 effective January 1, 2002.

Law Reviews.

Interpretation of Statutes in Derogation of the Common Law (Jefferson B. Fordham and J. Russell Leach), 3 Vand. L. Rev. 438.

61-1-105. Execution, filing, and recording of statements.

A statement may be filed in the office of the secretary of state. A certified copy of a statement that is filed in an office in another state may be filed in the office of the secretary of state in the manner and form prescribed by the secretary of state. Either filing has the effect provided in this chapter with respect to partnership property located, or transactions that occur, in this state.

A certified copy of a statement that has been filed in the office of the secretary of state and recorded in the office of the register of deeds has the effect provided for recorded statements in this chapter. A recorded statement that is not a certified copy of a statement filed in the office of the secretary of state does not have the effect provided for recorded statements in this chapter.

A statement filed by a partnership must be executed by at least two (2) partners. Other statements must be executed by a partner or other person authorized by this chapter. An individual who executes a statement as, or on behalf of, a partner or other person named as a partner in a statement shall personally declare under penalty of perjury that the contents of the statement are accurate.

A person authorized by this chapter to file a statement may amend or cancel the statement by filing an amendment or cancellation that names the partnership, identifies the statement, and states the substance of the amendment or cancellation.

A person who files a statement pursuant to this section shall promptly send a copy of the statement to every nonfiling partner and to any other person named as a partner in the statement. Failure to send a copy of a statement to a partner or other person does not limit the effectiveness of the statement as to a person not a partner.

Acts 2001, ch. 353; 2020, ch. 719, § 24.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 61-1-101 — 61-1-148, (Acts 1917, ch. 140, §§ 2-43; Shan., §§ 3141b2-3141b42 (p. 6585-6595) Shan. Supp., §§ 3118a53-3118a93; Acts 1927, ch. 34, §§ 1-3; Code 1932, §§ 7841-7882; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7854; Acts 1961, ch. 181, § 1; 1963, ch. 136, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-101—61-142; Acts 1982, ch. 773, § 1; Acts 1995 ch. 400, §§ 1-10; 1998, ch. 890, §§ 5, 6; 2000, ch. 568, § 4) was deleted and replaced by Acts 2001, ch. 353 effective January 1, 2002.

Amendments. The 2020 amendment, in (a), inserted “in the manner and form prescribed by the secretary of state.” in the second sentence, and substituted “located, or transactions that occur,” for “located in or transactions that occur” in the third sentence.

Effective Dates. Acts 2020, ch. 719, § 35, June 22, 2020.

61-1-106. Governing law.

Except as otherwise provided in subsections (b) and (c), the law of the jurisdiction in which a partnership has its chief executive office governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership.

Where the partners have provided that the partnership agreement is governed by the laws of a jurisdiction other than this state, the law of the jurisdiction governing the partnership agreement governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership.

The law of this state governs relations among the partners and between the partners and the partnership and the liability of partners for an obligation of a limited liability partnership that has filed an application as a limited liability partnership in this state.

Acts 2001, ch. 353.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 61-1-101 — 61-1-148, (Acts 1917, ch. 140, §§ 2-43; Shan., §§ 3141b2-3141b42 (p. 6585-6595) Shan. Supp., §§ 3118a53-3118a93; Acts 1927, ch. 34, §§ 1-3; Code 1932, §§ 7841-7882; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7854; Acts 1961, ch. 181, § 1; 1963, ch. 136, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-101—61-142; Acts 1982, ch. 773, § 1; Acts 1995 ch. 400, §§ 1-10; 1998, ch. 890, §§ 5, 6; 2000, ch. 568, § 4) was deleted and replaced by Acts 2001, ch. 353 effective January 1, 2002.

61-1-107. Partnership subject to amendment or repeal of chapter.

A partnership governed by this chapter is subject to any amendment to or repeal of this chapter.

Acts 2001, ch. 353.

Compiler's Notes. Former chapter 1, §§ 61-1-101 — 61-1-148, (Acts 1917, ch. 140, §§ 2-43; Shan., §§ 3141b2-3141b42 (p. 6585-6595) Shan. Supp., §§ 3118a53-3118a93; Acts 1927, ch. 34, §§ 1-3; Code 1932, §§ 7841-7882; mod. C. Supp. 1950, § 7854; Acts 1961, ch. 181, § 1; 1963, ch. 136, § 1; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), §§ 61-101—61-142; Acts 1982, ch. 773, § 1; Acts 1995 ch. 400, §§ 1-10; 1998, ch. 890, §§ 5, 6; 2000, ch. 568, § 4) was deleted and replaced by Acts 2001, ch. 353 effective January 1, 2002.